Alaska, session 34, SB60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 44.12.167. Myalgic Encephalomyelitis/Chronic Fatigue Syndrome 06 Day of Recognition. May 12 of each year is established as Myalgic 07 Encephalomyelitis/Chronic Fatigue Syndrome Day of Recognition. Myalgic 08 Encephalomyelitis/Chronic Fatigue Syndrome Day of Recognition may be observed 09 by suitable observances and exercises by civic groups and the public. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.